Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 5A Temporary Disabilities of Elected
Constitutional Executive
Officers

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article V, Section IV, Paragraph III of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

45-5A-1.
Certification of temporary disability by Supreme Court.

If, after hearing the evidence on the disability of an elected constitutional executive officer pursuant to Article V, Section IV of the Constitution of Georgia, the Supreme Court determines that such officer has a temporary disability, such court shall certify to the elected constitutional executive officers filing the petition that such executive officer has a temporary disability which prevents such officer from performing the duties of office.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.

45-5A-2.
Lieutenant Governor exercising powers and duties of Governor during temporary disability.

In case of the temporary disability of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor shall exercise the powers and duties of the Governor as provided in Article V, Section I, Paragraph V of the Constitution of Georgia until such time as the temporary disability of the Governor ends. The Lieutenant Governor shall receive the same compensation as the Governor until such time as the temporary disability of the Governor ends.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.

45-5A-3.
President Pro Tempore of the Senate exercising powers and duties of Lieutenant Governor during temporary disability.

In case of the temporary disability of the Lieutenant Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall exercise the powers and duties of the Lieutenant Governor and receive the same compensation as the Lieutenant Governor until such time as the temporary disability of the Lieutenant Governor ends.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.

45-5A-4.
Governor’s appointment of persons to perform duties of other officers during temporary disability.

In case of the temporary disability of the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, the State School Superintendent, the Commissioner of Insurance, the Commissioner of Agriculture, or the Commissioner of Labor, the Governor shall appoint a person to perform the duties of such elected constitutional executive officer until such time as the temporary disability of such officer ends.

The person appointed to perform the duties of an elected constitutional executive officer as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall have the qualifications to hold such office, shall give bond with good security if required of a person elected to such office, and shall take the oath of office. The person appointed to serve in the office of an incapacitated elected constitutional executive officer named in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to the confirmation of the Senate if the Senate is in session at the time of his appointment or convenes in session prior to the expiration of his appointment. Any such appointment made at times when the Senate is not in session shall be effective ad interim. The person appointed to perform the duties of an elected constitutional executive officer shall be authorized to perform every act and exercise every prerogative and discretion that a person holding such office is authorized to perform or exercise under existing law. Such person shall be entitled to receive the compensation as may be provided by law for such office during the period of incapacity of the elected constitutional executive officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “Commissioner of Insurance” was substituted for “Insurance Commissioner” in subsection (a).

45-5A-5.
Supreme Court to determine when temporary disability has ended; resumption of duties upon termination of temporary disability.

The Supreme Court shall determine when the temporary disability of an elected constitutional executive officer has ended and when the officer shall resume the exercise of the powers of office. The Supreme Court may hold hearings for such purpose.

Upon the Supreme Court certifying that the disability of an elected constitutional executive officer has ended, the appointment of the person performing the duties of such officer shall terminate. The elected constitutional executive officer shall thereafter assume and perform the duties of his office.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.

45-5A-6.
Officer compensation during temporary disability.

Whenever an elected constitutional executive officer is unable to exercise the duties of office due to a temporary disability and another person exercises the duties of office as provided in this chapter, during the period of disability the elected constitutional executive officer shall be entitled to receive the compensation as may be provided by law for such office.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1207, § 2.